Michigan, session 2025-2026, SB0338.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 16x. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.478a(2) Pub ord H Unauthorized process to obstruct a public officer or employee 2 750.478a(3) Pub ord G Unauthorized process to obstruct a public officer or employee ? subsequent offense 4 750.479(2) Person G Assaulting or obstructing certain officials 2 750.479(3) Person G Assaulting or obstructing certain officials causing injury 4 750.479(4) Person D Assaulting or obstructing certain officials causing serious impairment 10 750.479(5) Person B Assaulting or obstructing certain officials causing death 20 750.479a(2) Pub saf G Fleeing and eluding ? fourth degree 2 750.479a(3) Pub saf E Fleeing and eluding ? third degree 5 750.479a(4) Person C Fleeing and eluding ? second degree 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.479a(5) Person B Fleeing and eluding ? first degree 15 750.479b(1) Person F Disarming peace officer ? nonfirearm 4 750.479b(2) Person D Disarming peace officer ? firearm 10 750.479c(2)(c) Pub ord G Providing false information to peace officer conducting criminal investigation 2 750.479c(2)(d) Pub ord F Providing false or misleading information to peace officer conducting criminal investigation regarding certain felonies 4 750.480 Pub trst F Public officers ? refusing to turn over books/money to successor 4 750.483a(2)(b) Person D Withholding evidence, preventing report of crime, or retaliating for reporting crime punishable by more than 10 years 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.483a(4)(b) Person D Interfering with police investigation by committing crime or threatening to kill or injure 10 750.483a(6)(a) Pub ord F Tampering with evidence or offering false evidence 4 750.483a(6)(b) Pub ord D Tampering with evidence or offering false evidence in case punishable by more than 10 years 10 750.483a(7) Person G Intentionally deactivating body-worn camera used for law enforcement purposes while using excessive force 2 750.488 Pub trst H Public officers ? state official ? retaining fees 2 750.490 Pub trst H Public money ? safekeeping 2 750.491 Pub trst H Public records ? removal/mutilation/ destruction 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 750.492a(1)(a) Pub trst G Medical record ? intentional place false information ? health care provider 4 750.492a(2) Pub trst G Medical record ? health care provider ? altering to conceal injury/death 4 750.495a(2) Person F Concealing objects in trees or wood products ? causing injury 4 750.495a(3) Person C Concealing objects in trees or wood products ? causing death 15 750.498b(2)(a) Person E Tampering with, taking, or removing marine safety device without authority causing serious impairment 5 750.498b(2)(b) Person C Tampering with, taking, or removing marine safety device without authority causing death 15 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 750.502d Pub saf F Unlawfully possessing or transporting anhydrous ammonia or tampering with containers 4 750.505 Pub ord E Common law offenses 5 750.508(2)(b) Pub ord G Carrying or possessing a scanner in the commission of a crime 2 750.511 Person A Blocking or wrecking railroad track Life 750.512 Property E Uncoupling railroad cars 10 Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless Senate Bill No. 337 of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.